Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB963.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Part II of Title 68 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a subpart to read:SUBPART GCOMMON INTEREST COMMUNITIESChapter63. Municipal ServicesCHAPTER 63MUNICIPAL SERVICESSec.6301. Short title of chapter.6302. Definitions.6303. Municipal services to be provided.6304. Reimbursement for municipal services.6305. Arbitration.12345678910111213141516171819 6306. Additional services.6307. Applicability.6308. Construction.§ 6301. Short title of chapter.This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the Municipal Services Equalization and Tax Fairness Act.§ 6302. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Community." The following:(1) A condominium as defined in section 3103 (relating to definitions).(2) A cooperative as defined in section 4103 (relating to definitions).(3) A planned community as defined in section 5103 (relating to definitions).(4) A community under paragraph (1), (2) or (3) is a community regardless of:(i) Whether the community was created under this title.(ii) The number of units in the community.(iii) Whether individual units are owner occupied or leased.(iv) The following:(A) the public has open access to its streets;(B) the streets have been dedicated to the municipality; or(C) the streets meet the construction standards of the municipality.20250SB0963PN1102 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Municipal services." The following:(1) Any of the following services to the extent that they are provided to a noncommunity dwelling within a municipality or within the jurisdiction of a municipal authority that are paid for out of the general revenues of the municipality:(i) Solid waste collection and disposal, including household waste, leaves and recyclable materials.(ii) Removal of snow, ice and other obstructions from the cartway of roads and streets.(iii) Lighting of the roads and streets to the extent of payment for the electricity required, but not including the installation or maintenance of lamps, standards, wiring or other equipment.(iv) Maintenance, repair and replacement of sanitary sewer lines.(v) Maintenance, repair and replacement of water lines.(vi) Providing police, fire, ambulance and other emergency services, including fire hydrants.(vii) Any and all other services provided by a municipality or municipal authority to single family dwellings.(2) The term shall include services provided by a municipality regardless of whether the roads, streets or other improvements are dedicated to the municipality or owned or controlled by the community."Municipality." A borough, city of the first class, city of the second class, city of the third class, township of the first class and township of the second class. The term shall include a 20250SB0963PN1102 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 municipal authority as defined under 53 Pa.C.S. § 5602 (relating to definitions)."Noncommunity dwelling." A residential dwelling which is not part of a community.§ 6303. Municipal services to be provided.(a) Services.--Except as provided under subsection (b), every municipality shall provide to a community the same municipal services it provides to noncommunity dwellings.(b) Negotiated municipal services.--At the request of a community, the municipality in which the community is located shall negotiate the provision of municipal services. The negotiations shall result in a written agreement which:(1) describes the specific municipal services to be provided;(2) provides for the municipality to either supply the municipal services or to reimburse the community for the actual costs incurred by the community for the municipal services; and(3) describes the timing and procedures to be followed for the reimbursement from the municipality to the community as provided under section 6304 (relating to reimbursement for municipal services).(c) Compulsory arbitration.--In the event a community and municipality are unable to reach a negotiated written agreement for the provision of municipal services, the community and municipality shall enter into compulsory arbitration as provided under section 6305 (relating to arbitration).§ 6304. Reimbursement for municipal services.(a) Reimbursement.--Any amount received by a community from a municipality shall be applied as reimbursement to the 20250SB0963PN1102 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 community for the actual costs incurred by the community in performing the municipal services.(b) Actual costs.--The actual costs of providing the municipal services shall be evidenced by copies of paid invoices produced by the community to the municipality at times as may be agreed upon between the community and municipality in the written agreement.(c) Timing for reimbursement.--Reimbursements for municipal services shall be paid at least annually by the municipality to the community and no later than 90 days after the date on which the community provides the municipality with copies of invoices paid for by the community or other timing requirements as may be negotiated between the community and the municipality.(d) Disputes.--Any disputes pertaining to the amount of the reimbursement to be paid by the municipality to the community for the provision of municipal services shall be subject to arbitration as provided under section 6305 (relating to arbitration), unless otherwise agreed to, in writing, between the community and the municipality.§ 6305. Arbitration.(a) Request and appointment.--If a municipality and a community are unable to reach an understanding on the terms of an agreement within 90 days after a community has provided the municipality with a written request to negotiate the provision of municipal services, the community may request arbitration and a board of arbitrators shall be appointed as provided under subsection (b).(b) Board of arbitrators.--The board of arbitrators shall be composed of three individuals, one appointed by the municipality, one appointed by the community and a third member 20250SB0963PN1102 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 to be agreed upon by the other two arbitrators. The community arbitrator shall be named in the request for the appointment of the board of arbitrators. The municipal arbitrator shall be named within 10 days from the date the request is delivered. If, after a period of 10 days from the date of the appointment of the two arbitrators, the third arbitrator has not been selected, either arbitrator may request the American Arbitration Association to furnish a list of seven American Arbitration Association members from which a third arbitrator shall be selected. The municipal arbitrator shall eliminate a name from the list and then the two arbitrators shall alternately eliminate names until one name remains. That individual shall be the third or neutral arbitrator and shall act as chairperson of the board of arbitrators. The board of arbitrators established shall commence the arbitration proceedings within 30 days after the third arbitrator is selected and shall make its determination within 40 days after its hearing is concluded.(c) Powers of arbitrators.--Each of the arbitrators shall have the power to administer oaths and compel the attendance of witnesses and physical evidence by subpoena.(d) Determination.--The determination of the majority of the board of arbitrators shall be final on the issues in dispute and shall be binding upon the municipality and the community. The determination shall be in writing and a copy of the determination shall be forwarded to the municipality and the community. No appeal of the determination shall be allowed to any court. The determination shall constitute a mandate to the municipality or the community to take the action necessary to carry out the determination of the board of arbitrators.(e) Compensation.--The compensation, if any, of the neutral 20250SB0963PN1102 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 arbitrator shall be shared by the municipality and the community. The municipality and the community shall each pay its respective arbitrator. The cost of any stenographic expenses shall be paid by the party requesting a stenographic record.(f) Sole arbitrator.--The municipality and the community may conduct the arbitration provided under this section before a sole arbitrator if agreed upon between the municipality and the community, in writing.§ 6306. Additional services.Nothing in this chapter shall prevent a municipality from providing additional services that primarily serve public purposes to the residents of a community. The governing body of a municipality, which prior to the effective date of this section has enacted an ordinance providing all the municipal services or reimbursement provided by this chapter to a community, may repeal the ordinance and implement the provisions of this chapter.§ 6307. Applicability.This chapter applies to all cities of the first class, cities of the second class, cities of the third class, boroughs, townships of the first class and townships of the second class that render municipal services.§ 6308. Construction.Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as abrogating or superseding any agreement in effect under an ordinance providing all the municipal services or reimbursement provided by this chapter to a community prior to the effective date of this section.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0963PN1102 - 7 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526272829